District of Columbia statutes.
7-840

Effective date.

This subchapter shall take effect on October 1, 1980, after a 30-day period of Congressional review following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor, action by the Council of the District of Columbia to override the veto) as provided in § 1-206.02(c)(1).

Apr. 29, 1980, D.C. Law 3-65, § 11, 27 DCR 1087

History

1981 Ed., § 6-320.

Prior Codifications

For temporary authorization for the establishment of a program to provide early intervention services designed to meet the developmental needs of infants and toddlers from birth through 2 years of age and their families on a sliding fee scale to provide a system of payment for early intervention services based on the income of the family, see § 2 of the Early Intervention Services Sliding Fee Scale Establishment Emergency Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-320, August 4, 1994, 41 DCR 5369), § 2 of the Early Intervention Services Sliding Fee Scale Establishment Congressional Adjournment Emergency Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-329, October 21, 1994, 41 DCR 7160), and § 2 of the Early Intervention Services Sliding Fee Scale Establishment Congressional Adjournment Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-1, January 18, 1995, 42 DCR 537).
Section 3 of D.C. Act 10-320 provided that the Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of the act.
Section 3 of D.C. Act 10-329 provided that the Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of the act.
Section 3 of D.C. Act 11-1 provided that the Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of the act.
For temporary authorization for the establishment of a program to provide early intervention services designed to meet the developmental needs of infants and toddlers from birth through 2 years of age and their families on a sliding fee scale to provide a system of payment for early intervention services based on the income of the family, see § 2 of the Early Intervention Services Sliding Fee Scale Establishment Emergency Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-320, August 4, 1994, 41 DCR 5369), § 2 of the Early Intervention Services Sliding Fee Scale Establishment Congressional Adjournment Emergency Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-329, October 21, 1994, 41 DCR 7160), § 2 of the Early Intervention Services Sliding Fee Scale Establishment Congressional Adjournment Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-1, January 18, 1995, 42 DCR 537), § 2 of the Early Intervention Services Sliding Fee Scale Establishment Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-188, January 25, 1996, 43 DCR 395), and see § 2 of the Early Intervention Services Sliding Fee Scale Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-41, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2089).
Section 3 of D.C. Act 12-41 provided that the Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of the act.

Emergency Legislation